Hawaii statutes.
§198D-5 Identification of proposed,
potential, and needed trails and accesses. (a) In addition to the
inventories under section 198D-3, the department shall identify and maintain a
listing of:

(1) Proposed trails and accesses which may be opened
to the public;

(2) Potential expansions of trails and accesses;

(3) Potential or desirable connectors between
existing trail systems;

(4) Public beach, shore, park, trail, and other
recreational areas to which access is unavailable or inadequate; and

(5) Trails and accesses to public hunting areas.

(b) The listing may be published in the
inventories required under section 198D-3. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2; am L 1990,
c 53, §1(3)]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next